Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2184
Referees; bond; conditions; further security.

Before proceeding to sell, the referee or referees shall each give security, to be fixed by the court and to be approved by the clerk of said court or the judge thereof, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his duties. At any time thereafter the court may require further and better security.

R.S.1867, Code § 816, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8299;

Laws 1917, c. 141, § 1, p. 327;

C.S.1922, § 9252;

C.S.1929, § 20-2184;

R.S.1943, § 25-2184.